Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 14. Alaska Military Youth Academy.

Sec. 14.30.740.
Funding for Alaska Challenge Youth Academy program. [Repealed, § 3 ch 72 SLA 2013.]

Sec. 14.30.745.
Provision of student information to academy.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, on or before January 15 and July 15 of each year, a school district shall provide to the director of the Alaska Military Youth Academy, operated by the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs for the purpose of educating and training youth, a biannual report containing the name, last known address, and dates of attendance of a student who

is at least 15 years of age but less than 19 years of age;

was enrolled but is no longer enrolled in a school in the district;

has not provided school transfer or graduation information to a school in the district; and

has not received a high school diploma or general educational development certificate.

At the beginning of each school year, a school district shall provide a written notice to the parent or guardian of the student, or, if the student is at least 18 years of age, to the student, of the disclosure of the information under (a) of this section and provide an opportunity for objection to the disclosure.

The official to whom the information in (a) of this section is provided shall certify in writing to the school district providing the information that the information will not be disclosed to any other party except as necessary to recruit and retain students.

In this section, “district” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in (a), substituted “Alaska Military Youth Academy” for “Alaska Challenge Youth Academy”.

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 108, SLA 2010, which enacted this section, is effective September 23, 2010.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 108, SLA 2010, directs that this section “applies to students who left school on or after September 1, 2010.”

Sec. 14.30.750.
Alaska school counseling program grant fund. [Repealed, § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997.]